District of Columbia statutes.
16-1320

Fixing time for return of verdict.

In every case involving the condemnation of real property under this subchapter, at the close of the hearing thereof, the court shall fix a time in which the jury shall return its verdict or the report to the court the reasons why the verdict or appraisement can not be returned by the time fixed. The court has discretion to extend the time for the return of the verdict or appraisement.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 575, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1320.
1973 Ed., § 16-1320.